Nevada, session 83, AB255.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 613 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An employment contract or other agreement between an
employer and an employee or a contract or other agreement
between an employer and an independent contractor to provide
services to the employer must not contain any condition,
stipulation or provision that requires the employee or independent
contractor to pay to the employer or other person designated by
the employer any sum of money if the employee leaves the
employment of the employer or the independent contractor ceases
providing services to the employer before the passage of a
specified period, regardless of whether the payment is
characterized as reimbursement for any training provided,
replacement costs, training costs for a replacement employee, lost
revenue, liquidated damages or any other substantially similar
characterization.
2. An employer shall not:
(a) Request that an employee, prospective employee or
independent contractor enter into a contract or other agreement
that violates subsection 1.
(b) Require a prospective employee or independent contractor,
as a condition of employment or the entering of a contract for
services, to enter into a contract or other agreement that violates
subsection 1.
(c) Execute or attempt to enforce any condition, stipulation or
provision of a contract or other agreement that violates
subsection 1.
(d) Obtain or attempt to obtain a waiver of the provisions of
this section.
3. Any condition, stipulation or provision of a contract or
other agreement that violates subsection 1 and any waiver of the
provisions of this section is contrary to public policy, void and
unenforceable.
-
*AB255*

– 3 –
4. Each act that constitutes a violation of subsection 2
constitutes a separate violation.
5. In addition to any other penalty, the Labor Commissioner
may impose against an employer who violates subsection 2 an
administrative fine of not less than $1,000 and not more than
$5,000 for each violation. If the Labor Commissioner imposes an
administrative fine pursuant to this subsection, the Labor
Commissioner may recover the costs of the proceeding, including,
without limitation, investigative costs and reasonable attorney’s
fees.
6. In addition to any other penalty, the Attorney General may
bring an action in the name of the State of Nevada against an
employer who violates subsection 2 seeking an injunction or other
equitable relief or a civil penalty of not less than $1,000 and not
more than $5,000 for each violation. If the Attorney General
prevails in such an action, the Attorney General is entitled to
recover the costs of the proceeding, including, without limitation,
investigative costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.
7. An employee, prospective employee or independent
contractor aggrieved by an employer’s violation of subsection 2
may bring an action on his or her own behalf or on behalf of a
similarly situated class of persons against the employer to recover
or obtain:
(a) Actual damages;
(b) Additional statutory damages of $5,000 for each violation;
(c) An injunction or other equitable relief; and
(d) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
8. The Labor Commissioner may adopt regulations to carry
out the provisions of this section.
9. The provisions of this section do not apply to any
condition, stipulation or provision in a contract or other
agreement that provides for the repayment of any cash advance or
money paid as prepayment for services to be provided.
10. As used in this section, “employer” does not include a
public employer.
Sec. 2. The provisions of this act apply to any contract or
agreement entered into before, on or after October 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB255*